src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NI-fealsamh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:fealsamh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:fealsaimh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:fealsamh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:fealsúna^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:fealsúna^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:fealsúna      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-casadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:casadh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:casaidh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:casadh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:castaí^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:castaí^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:castaí        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-smearadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:smearadh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:smearaidh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:smearadh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:smearthaí^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:smearthaí^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:smearthaí     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-síneadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:síneadh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:sínidh^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:síneadh       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:síntí^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:síntí^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:síntí     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-líonadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:líonadh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:líonta^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:líonadh       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-forlíonadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:forlíonadh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:forlíonaidh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:forlíonadh        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-scaitheamh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scaitheamh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:scaithimh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:scaitheamh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:scaití^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:scaití^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:scaití        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-fáidh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:fáidh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:fáidh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:fáidh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:fáithe^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:fáithe^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:fáithe        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-príomháidh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:príomháidh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:príomháidh^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:príomháidh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:príomháithe^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:príomháithe^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:príomháithe       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-lagar
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lagar^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:lagair^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:lagar     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:lagracha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:lagracha^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:lagracha      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ceáfar
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ceáfar^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:ceáfair^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:ceáfar        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:ceáfraí^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:ceáfraí^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:ceáfraí       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-boladh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:boladh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:bolaidh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:boladh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:bolaithe^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:bolaithe^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:bolaithe      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-drámh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:drámh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:dráimh^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:drámh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:dráite^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:dráite^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:dráite        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-spraoi
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:spraoi^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:spraoi^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:spraoi        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:spraíonna^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:spraíonna^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:spraíonna     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-claíomh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:claíomh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:claímh^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:claíomh       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:claimhte^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:claimhte^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:claimhte      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-easna
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:easna^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:easna^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:easna     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:easnacha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:easnacha^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:easnacha      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-giorria
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:giorria^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:giorria^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:giorria       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:giorriacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:giorriacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:giorriacha        Voc-initial;

!!LEXICON NI-múisiam
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:múisiam^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:múisiam^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:múisiam     Voc-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:múisiamaí^C     Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:múisiamaí^G  Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:múisiamaí       Voc-initial;

!!LEXICON NI-monarc
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:monarc^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:monarc^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:monarc      Voc-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:monarcaí^C      Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:monarcaí^G   Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:monarcaí        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-dosaen
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:dosaen^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:dosaen^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:dosaen        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:dosaenacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:dosaenacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:dosaenacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-péas
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:péas^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:péas^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:péas      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:péas^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:péas^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:péas      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-uamhan
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:uamhan^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:uamhain^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:uamhan        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:uamhna^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:uamhan^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:uamhna        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-lia
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lia^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:lia^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:lia       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:liaga^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:liag^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:liaga     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-cuach
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:cuach^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:cuaiche^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:cuach     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:cuacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:cuach^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:cuacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-triuch
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:triuch^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:treacha^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:triuch        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-toghadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:toghadh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:tofa^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:toghadh       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-riastradh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:riastradh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:riastartha^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:riastradh     Voc-initial;
