src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounsIrregular
riastradh:		NI-riastradh;
toghadh:		NI-toghadh;
triuch:		NI-triuch;
cuach:		NI-cuach;
lia:		NI-lia;
uamhan:		NI-uamhan;
péas:		NI-péas;
dosaen:		NI-dosaen;
giorria:		NI-giorria;
easna:		NI-easna;
claíomh:		NI-claíomh;
marc-chlaíomh:marc-^CB		NI-claíomh;
spraoi:			NI-spraoi;
drámh:			NI-drámh;
boladh:			NI-boladh;
ceáfar:			NI-ceáfar;
lagar:			NI-lagar;
príomháidh:	NI-príomháidh;
fáidh:		NI-fáidh;
scaitheamh:	NI-scaitheamh;
líonadh:	NI-líonadh;
forlíonadh:	NI-forlíonadh;
síneadh:		NI-síneadh;
smearadh:		NI-smearadh;
casadh:		NI-casadh;
fealsamh:		NI-fealsamh;
